Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF910.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.223, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Headlight requirement. The provisions of section 169.974, subdivision 5, paragraph deleted text begin (k)deleted text end new text begin (i)new text end , apply to motorized bicycles that are equipped with headlights. A new motorized bicycle sold or offered for sale in Minnesota must be equipped with a headlight. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.974, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Driving rules. (a) An operator of a motorcycle must ride only upon a permanent and regular seat which is attached to the vehicle for that purpose. No other person may ride on a motorcycle, except that passengers may ride (1) upon a permanent and regular operator's seat if designed for two persons, (2) upon additional seats attached to or in the vehicle, or (3) in a sidecar attached to the vehicle. The operator of a motorcycle is prohibited from carrying passengers in a number in excess of the designed capacity of the motorcycle or sidecar attached to it. A passenger is prohibited from being carried in a position that interferes with the safe operation of the motorcycle or the view of the operator. (b) No person may ride upon a motorcycle as a passenger unless the person can reach the footrests or floorboards with both feet. (c) Except for passengers of sidecars, drivers and passengers of three-wheeled motorcycles, and persons in an autocycle, no person may operate or ride upon a motorcycle except while sitting astride the seat, facing forward, with one leg on either side of the motorcycle. (d) No person may operate a motorcycle while carrying animals, packages, bundles, or other cargo that prevent the person from keeping both hands on the handlebars. (e) new text begin No person may operate a motorcycle between lanes of moving or stationary vehicles headed in the same direction, nor may any person drive a motorcycle abreast of or overtake or pass another vehicle within the same traffic lane. new text end Motorcycles may, with the consent of both drivers, be operated not more than two abreast in a single traffic lane if the vehicles fit safely within the designated space of the lane. deleted text begin (f) Except under the conditions specified in paragraph (g), no person may operate a motorcycle: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) between lanes of moving or stationary vehicles headed in the same direction of travel; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) abreast of moving or stationary vehicles within the same traffic lane; or deleted text end deleted text begin (3) to overtake or pass another vehicle within the same traffic lane. deleted text end deleted text begin (g) A person may operate a motorcycle and overtake and pass another vehicle in the same direction of travel and within the same traffic lane if the motorcycle is operated: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) at not more than 25 miles per hour; and deleted text end deleted text begin (2) no more than 15 miles per hour over the speed of traffic in the relevant traffic lanes. deleted text end deleted text begin (h)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end Motor vehicles including motorcycles are entitled to the full use of a traffic lane and no motor vehicle may be driven or operated in a manner so as to deprive a motorcycle of the full use of a traffic lane. deleted text begin (i)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end A person operating a motorcycle upon a roadway must be granted the rights and is subject to the duties applicable to a motor vehicle as provided by law, except as to those provisions which by their nature can have no application. deleted text begin (j) Paragraphsdeleted text end new text begin (h) Paragraphnew text end (e) deleted text begin and (f) of this subdivision dodeleted text end new text begin doesnew text end not apply to police officers in the performance of their official duties. deleted text begin (k)deleted text end new text begin (i)new text end No person may operate a motorcycle on a street or highway unless the headlight or headlights are lighted at all times the motorcycle is so operated. deleted text begin (l)deleted text end new text begin (j)new text end A person parking a motorcycle on the roadway of a street or highway must: (1) if parking in a marked parking space, park the motorcycle completely within the marked space; and (2) park the motorcycle in such a way that the front of the motorcycle is pointed or angled toward the nearest lane of traffic to the extent practicable and necessary to allow the operator to (i) view any traffic in both directions of the street or highway without having to move the motorcycle into a lane of traffic and without losing balance or control of the motorcycle, and (ii) ride the motorcycle forward and directly into a lane of traffic when the lane is sufficiently clear of traffic. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. Laws 2024, chapter 127, article 1, section 4, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Traffic Safety -0- deleted text begin 1,400,000 deleted text end new text begin 1,200,000 new text end Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.705, regarding the use of funds from this account, $1,200,000 in fiscal year 2025 is from the driver and vehicle services operating account in the special revenue fund for the Lights On grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 169.515. The commissioner must contract with the Lights On! microgrant program to administer and operate the grant program. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, the commissioner may use up to two percent of this appropriation for administrative costs. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2026. deleted text begin $200,000 in fiscal year 2025 is from the motorcycle safety account in the special revenue fund for the public education campaign on motorcycle operation under article 3, section 122. This is a onetime appropriation. deleted text end Sec. 4. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Laws 2024, chapter 127, article 3, section 122, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Session Laws: 25-02197 Laws 2024, chapter 127, article 3, section 122 Sec. 122. new text begin PUBLIC EDUCATION CAMPAIGN; MOTORCYCLE OPERATIONS.new text end new text begin The commissioner of public safety must implement a statewide public education campaign to alert drivers and the public on how motorcycles may safely overtake and pass a vehicle within the same lane or between parallel lanes. The information must be consistent with the requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 169.974, subdivision 5. new text end